California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(4) Utilizing a telephone number other than a 900 number from which a caller can be automatically connected to the information-access service.

(5) Soliciting callers to call a telephone number other than a 900 number, including, but not limited to, an 800 telephone number, when the caller who calls that other number will be referred to a 900 number unless all solicitations for the initial information-access program clearly and conspicuously disclose that a referral will be made and the cost to the caller for calling the 900 number to which the caller will be referred.

(6) Soliciting callers to call a number other than a 900 number, including, but not limited to, an 800 telephone number, when the caller who calls that number will be asked to accept one or more collect
 calls unless all solicitations clearly and conspicuously disclose that the caller will be asked to accept one or more collect calls and the cost to the caller for accepting the collect calls. The cost shall be described as cost per minute and cost per hour.

(7) Referring a caller from one 900 number to another 900 number unless all solicitations for the initial information-access program clearly and conspicuously disclose that a referral will be made and the cost to the caller for calling the 900 number to which the caller will be referred.

(8) Advertising that the information-access service is free.

(9) Using any printing style, graphic, layout, text, color, or format which states or implies that the solicitation originates from, or was issued by or on behalf of a governmental agency, a public utility, a nonprofit
 organization, an insurance company, a credit reporting agency, a collection company, or a law firm unless the same is true.

(c) It is unlawful for any person to solicit or sell an information-access service unless the following information is clearly and conspicuously disclosed in all solicitations:

(1) An accurate description of the information-access service.

(2) The name, address, and non-900 telephone number of the information provider.

(3) The cost of the call, which shall be disclosed as follows:

(A) If the call is billed at a fixed rate, the total cost of the call.

(B) If the call is billed on a usage-sensitive basis,
 the cost per minute or other unit of time, and including:

(i) In broadcast solicitations, the average cost of the call.

(ii) In print solicitations, the average cost or length of the call, except that print solicitations directed to persons in this state shall disclose the average cost of the call.

(C) Solicitations in which the length of the program cannot reasonably be determined because the length of the program depends upon the skill of, or the selections or responses made by, the caller, shall be exempt from the cost disclosure provisions of this paragraph.

(D) Solicitations that are oral shall include a voice announcement of the cost of the call in clear and understandable language that is clearly audible and articulated at a volume equal to that
 used to announce the 900 number. The cost of the call shall be stated immediately prior to or immediately after the 900 number is stated.

(E) Solicitations that are broadcast visually shall include, in clear, visible, easily readable, and conspicuously presented letters and numbers, set against a contrasting background, the cost of calling the 900 number. The visual disclosure of the cost of the call shall be displayed directly above, below, or adjacent to the number to be called whenever the number is displayed in the commercial. The visual disclosure of the cost of the call shall be a distinct disclosure and shall not be combined in the same paragraph with any other disclosure required to be made pursuant to this section. The lettering of the visual disclosure shall be no less than 18 scan lines high and shall be displayed for as long as the number is displayed. Broadcast solicitations shall also include a voice announcement of the cost of
 the call in clear and understandable language that is clearly audible and articulated at a volume equal to that used to announce the 900 number. The cost of the call shall be stated immediately prior to or after the 900 number is stated.

(F) Solicitations that appear in print shall include, in clear, visible, easily readable, and conspicuously presented letters and numbers, the cost of calling the 900 number. The printed disclosure of the cost of the call shall be displayed directly above, below, or adjacent to the number. The lettering of the cost disclosure shall be in no less than 10-point type.

(4) If the information-access service is aimed at or likely to be of interest to minors, solicitations that appear in print shall contain a statement, in at least the same size print as that used to disclose the 900 number, that persons under the age of 18 years should obtain parental
 consent before calling. If the solicitation is through a broadcast, this statement shall be of the same audibility as that used to disclose the 900 number.

(d) It shall be unlawful for any person to solicit or sell an information-access service in any manner related to a sweepstakes.

(e) Solicitations made to persons in this state offering the opportunity to participate in a sweepstakes shall, with respect to each prize offered, set forth clearly, conspicuously, and in easily readable letters the odds of receiving that prize, described in whole Arabic numerals in a format such as: “1 chance in 100,000” or “1:100,000.” If the odds depend upon the number of entries and the number of persons solicited is controlled by the sponsor of the promotion, the solicitation shall set forth the reasonable expectation of entries. If the odds depend upon the number of entries received and the
 number of persons solicited is not controlled by the sponsor of the sweepstakes, a statement to the effect that the odds depend on the number of entries received shall be sufficient. If more than one prize is offered, the odds shall be separately stated for each prize. The disclosure required to be made pursuant to this subdivision shall be made immediately adjacent to the first identification of the prize to which it relates or in a separate section entitled “Consumer Disclosure” or “Official Rules.” These titles shall be printed in no less than 10-point boldface type. The consumer disclosure section shall be clearly and conspicuously disclosed in the solicitation. There shall be a statement referring the recipient of the solicitation to the consumer disclosure section in the main text of the solicitation in close proximity to the description of the prizes, and the odds shall be disclosed within the top 25 percent of the consumer disclosure section. If the consumer disclosure section does not appear on the
 same page as the statement referring the recipient of the solicitation to this section, the statement shall indicate where the consumer disclosure section is located. If the odds appear in the section entitled “Consumer Disclosure” or “Official Rules,” there shall be a clear and conspicuous statement in the main text of the solicitation in close proximity to the description of the prizes that the odds to the recipient of obtaining the prize or prizes will be found elsewhere, and the statement shall set forth where they will be found. It is not a violation of this section to reference the official rules and the odds in the same statement as long as the statement referencing the official rules and the odds is in the main text of the solicitation in close proximity to the description of the prizes. For example, a statement such as: “See official rules (on (reference to location of rules if not on same page)) for odds and other details” or a similar statement meets the requirements of this provision. This
 provision shall not apply to broadcast solicitations for sweepstakes in which the winners will be selected in a random drawing in which the odds depend on the number of entries received, provided that those solicitations shall disclose where the official rules are available and the official rules shall set forth the odds of winning in accordance with this subdivision.

(f) If any incentive is offered in a solicitation for an information-access service, the solicitation shall clearly and conspicuously disclose all restrictions, qualifications, and deadlines that must be complied with in order to obtain the incentive being offered.

(g) No person soliciting callers for an information-access service shall represent directly or by implication that the person being solicited is part of a significantly limited group selected to receive an incentive, unless that is true and the number of
 recipients who will be receiving the solicitation is clearly and conspicuously set forth in the solicitation.

(h) It is unlawful for any person to solicit or sell an information-access service to any person in the following manner:

(1) The solicitation offers to persons in this state who respond to the solicitation by calling a 900 number any incentive that:

(A) Requires the recipient to purchase goods or services from the information provider in order to utilize the incentive. However, this subparagraph does not apply to offers where the incentive is a “cents-off” coupon that is usable only for the purchase of the offeror’s own brand name product or products, the total value of the “cents-off” coupon offered is clearly and conspicuously disclosed in the offer, the total value of the “cents-off” coupon does not
 exceed five dollars ($5), the “cents-off” coupon is to be utilized to reduce the price of those products at retail stores in the recipient’s area, and at least 60 percent of the revenue per month of the offeror is derived from the sale of the product or products being purchased without the use of the “cents-off” coupons.

(B) Requires the recipient to purchase goods or services from any third party in order to utilize the incentive unless:

(i) The fact that a purchase or payment is required in order to utilize the incentive is disclosed in the solicitation.

(ii) A representative sample of the establishments at which the incentive may be redeemed is disclosed in the solicitation.

(iii) If the incentive entitles the recipient to save money on the purchase
 of goods or services, the incentive is described as a cents-off, discount coupon, or similar term that clearly indicates that it is redeemable only for savings on purchases of goods or services.

(2) The solicitation states or implies that the caller is likely to receive one of the prizes offered, by representing in the solicitation that other named persons have already won the other prizes being offered in the solicitation and that the recipient of the solicitation is therefore likely to receive the prize that has not been won by the other persons named in the solicitation, unless the recipient’s odds of receiving the remaining prize are clearly and conspicuously disclosed in the solicitation in close proximity to the list of the other named persons.

(i) Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to render lawful any activity that otherwise would violate Section 17537.

(j) No information-access service shall offer a game of skill in which the cost of the call is billed on a usage-sensitive basis and in which answers to multiple choice questions of increasing difficulty are required in order to win, unless the solicitation clearly and conspicuously discloses the percentage of contestants anticipated to answer all questions correctly based on prior experience or, if the game is being operated for the first time, based on a good faith estimate.

(k) This section does not apply to a regional telephone operating company, interexchange carrier, or local telephone company operating in those capacities, that in good faith telecommunicates an information-access program without knowledge that the program or related advertising violates any provision of this section, Section 17539.55, or Section 17539.6.

(l) Neither this section, Section 17539.55, nor Section 17539.6 applies to the California State Lottery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.55.

(a) It shall be unlawful to operate a sweepstakes in this state through the use of a 900 number, unless the information provider registers with the Department of Justice as provided in this section within 10 days after causing any advertisement for the sweepstakes to be directed to any person in this state.

(b) The registration shall include the following information:

(1) Each 900 number to be used in the sweepstakes.

(2) The name and address of the information provider including corporate identity, if any, and the name and address for the information provider’s agent for service of process within the state.

(3) A copy of the information provider’s audio text, prerecorded, or live operator scripts.

(4) A copy of the official rules for the sweepstakes.

(5) For television, video, or any on-screen advertisements, a copy of the storyboard and video recording.

(6) For radio advertisements, a copy of the script and audio recording.

(7) For print or electronic form transmitted over the Internet, a copy of all advertisements.

(8) For direct mail solicitations, a copy of all principal solicitations.

(9) For telephone solicitations, a copy of the script.

(10) The names of the carriers that the information provider plans to utilize to carry the 900 number calls.

(c) The information provider shall pay an annual registration fee of fifty dollars ($50) for each 900 number used for sweepstakes purposes.

(d) It shall be unlawful for any information provider that operates a sweepstakes to make reference, in any contact with the public, to the fact that the information provider is registered with the Department of
 Justice, as required by this section, or in any other manner imply that that registration represents approval of the sweepstakes by the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 5.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.6.

Any broadcast or print advertisement or notice that contains a 900 number shall be written or spoken in the same language as the language used in a recorded message or by a live operator of the 900 number call.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 944, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Sellers of Travel [17550. - 17550.30.]

17550.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Certain advertising, sales, and business practices of sellers of travel have worked financial hardship upon the people of this state.

(2) The travel business has a significant impact upon the economy and well-being of this state and its people.

(3) Problems have arisen that are peculiar to sellers of travel business.

(4) The public welfare requires regulation of sellers of travel in order to eliminate
 unfair advertising, sales, and business practices, to establish standards that will safeguard the people against financial hardship, to encourage competition, fair dealing, and prosperity in the travel business, and to provide certain and reliable funding for the seller of travel registration program and enforcement by the office of the Attorney General of this article.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article that the Department of Justice, to the extent that resources are available, work together with representatives of the affected business community to develop sample forms that will, to the maximum extent possible, enable sellers of travel to comply with the requirement to provide to persons making payment the information required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17550.13, in a manner that is
 simplified, efficient, and nonduplicative, and in a manner that recognizes the particular burdens and situations that may exist for small sellers of travel in their efforts to comply with the provisions of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 517, Sec. 1.   (AB 2106)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.1.

(a) “Seller of travel” means a person who sells, provides, furnishes, contracts for, arranges, or advertises that he or she can or may arrange, or has arranged, wholesale or retail , either of the following:

(1) Air or sea transportation either separately or in conjunction with other travel services.

(2) Land or water vessel transportation, other than sea carriage, either separately or in conjunction with other
 travel services if the total charge to the passenger exceeds three hundred dollars ($300).

(b) Seller of travel does not include any of the following:

(1) An air carrier.

(2) An ocean carrier.

(3) A hotel, motel, or similar lodging establishment where in the course of selling, providing, furnishing, contracting for, or arranging transient lodging accommodations and related services for its registered guests, it also arranges for transportation and does not directly or indirectly receive any money or other valuable consideration for arranging or providing that transportation.

(4) A person or organization certified under Part 5 (commencing with Section 12140) of Division 2 of the Insurance
 Code, except such a person or organization shall comply with the registration and fee provisions of Sections 17550.20 and 17550.21 for each location at which air or sea transportation is sold either separately or in conjunction with other travel services.

(5) A motor or rail carrier or water vessel operator holding the required permit, license, or other authority to operate from a state, federal, or other governmental entity.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a reference in this article or Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35) to air or sea transportation or to an air or sea carrier, includes land or water vessel transportation, as described in subdivision (a), and a motor carrier or water vessel operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 628, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.2.

“Advertise” means to make any representation in the solicitation of air or sea transportation, and includes communication with other members of the same partnership, corporation, joint venture, association, organization, group, or other entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1995, pursuant to Section 17550.33 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

17550.3.

“Passenger” is a person on whose behalf money or other consideration has been given or is to be given to another, including another member of the same partnership, corporation, joint venture, association, organization, group, or other entity, for air or sea transportation, other travel services, or both, for that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 924, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.4.

An air carrier is a transporter by air of persons that operates under a certificate of convenience and necessity issued by the United States Department of Transportation or under the certification of a foreign government that is recognized by the United States Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.5.

“Ticket or voucher” means a writing that is itself good and sufficient to obtain the entire air or ocean transportation, or travel services, which the passenger has purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 924, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.6.

“Officially appointed agent” means an agent expressly appointed as such, without reservation, for a specified time period, in a written instrument executed by the principal or an authorized representative of the principal. The written instrument shall identify the current name, address, and telephone numbers of the principal and agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1995, pursuant to Section 17550.33 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

17550.7.

“Participant in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund” is a registered seller of travel with its principal place of business in California, who does business with persons located in California, or is a registered seller of travel that does business in California, from one or more locations in California, and that meets the requirements of paragraph (16) of subdivision (e) of Section 17511.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1995, pursuant to Section 17550.33 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

17550.8.

“Provider” means the person or entity who actually provides any transportation or travel services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1995, pursuant to Section 17550.33 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

17550.9.

“Travel services” includes, but is not limited to, lodging, surface transportation, transfers, tours, meals, guides, baggage transfer, sightseeing, recreational activities, vehicle rental, or other travel-related services, however denominated, including, but not limited to, travel certificates, registration fees, and processing fees. “Travel services” does not include travel services rendered by providers of lodging such as a hotel, motel, or similar lodging establishment where the provider of lodging supplies only that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 924, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.10.

“Travel certificate” means a writing that represents the holder is entitled to air or sea transportation or travel services, to a discount or reduced price for that transportation or those travel services, or to purchase that transportation or those travel services from a specified source, whether or not the holder is required to pay additional money or fulfill any requirements in order to utilize the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 924, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.11.

(a) “Adequate bond” means a bond executed by an admitted surety insurer in an amount at all times no less than at least equal to the amount required to be held in a trust account pursuant to Section 17550.15 by any seller of travel in conjunction with such transportation, for the benefit of every passenger who sustains a monetary loss as a result of any violation of this article by a seller of travel or any failure by a seller of travel or by any official, agent, or employee of the seller of travel acting in the course or scope of their employment or agency. A seller of travel filing the bond shall maintain the bond in force in the proper amount as a condition of continuing to engage in business. The admitted surety insurer issuing the bond shall provide 30 days’ written notice before
 cancellation or termination of the bond to the seller of travel filing the bond and the office of the Attorney General, Consumer Protection Section. Cancellation of the bond shall not limit or exonerate the surety insurer from claims against the bond arising during the period it was in force.

(b) No passenger may recover upon the bond a sum greater than that which the passenger paid to the seller of travel, provided that this limitation shall not restrict a passenger from recovering sums greater than those paid to the seller of travel from sources other than the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 5.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.13.

(a) (1) A seller of travel shall not receive any money or other valuable consideration in payment for air or sea transportation or other travel services offered by the seller of travel unless at the time of or prior to the receipt of payment, the seller of travel first furnishes to the person making that payment written materials conspicuously setting forth the following information:

(A) The name and business address and telephone number of the seller
 of travel.

(B) The total amount to be paid by or on behalf of the passenger, amount paid to date, the date of any future payment, the purpose of the payment made, and an itemized statement of the balance due, if any.

(C) The name of the provider of the air or sea transportation, and the date, time, and place of each departure, or the circumstances under which the date, time, and place of departure will be determined.

(D) All terms and conditions relating to the air or sea transportation or travel services being purchased by the passenger, including cancellation conditions. An air carrier’s or an ocean carrier’s standard contract of carriage is not required to be disclosed prior to the seller of travel receiving any money or other valuable consideration.

(E) A clear and conspicuous statement that upon cancellation of the transportation or travel services, where the passenger is not at fault and has not canceled in violation of any terms and conditions previously clearly and conspicuously disclosed to and agreed to by the passenger, all sums paid to the seller of travel for services not provided will be promptly paid to the passenger, unless the passenger otherwise advises the seller of travel in writing, after cancellation.

(F) If the seller of travel is required by this article to have a trust account or bond, a clear and conspicuous disclosure stating: “California law requires certain sellers of travel to have a trust account or bond. This business has [a trust account] or [a bond issued by (company) in the amount of ($X)].”

(G) If the seller of travel is a participant in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund and the
 passenger, or the person making payment for the passenger, was located in California at the time of the sale of air or sea transportation or travel services, a clear and conspicuous notice of the right of the passenger, or the right of the person making payment for the passenger, to make a claim on that fund. The notice shall include a description of the losses covered, the method for making a claim, the time limit within which the claim shall be made, and the amount which may be claimed.

(H) If the seller of travel is a participant in a Consumer Protection Deposit Plan that meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 17550.16, a clear and conspicuous notice of the passenger’s right to make a claim on the plan. That notice shall include a description of the losses covered, the method for making a claim, the time limit within which the claim shall be made, and the amount that may be claimed.

(I) If the seller of travel is a participant in a Consumer Protection Escrow Plan that meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 17550.16, a clear and conspicuous notice of the passenger’s right to make a claim on the plan. That notice shall include a description of the losses covered, the method for making a claim, the time limit within which the claim shall be made, and the amount that may be claimed.

(J) If the seller of travel is not a participant, a clear and conspicuous disclosure that the seller of travel is not a participant in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund. That disclosure shall be made both orally and in writing.

(K) If the seller of travel is a participant in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund and the passenger or any person who made a payment on behalf of the passenger for travel
 services is located in California, a clear and conspicuous disclosure made both orally and in writing that the transaction is covered by the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund.

(2) There is no violation of this subdivision if both of the following occur:

(A) Compliance was rendered impossible as a direct result of an unforeseen condition beyond the control of the seller of travel.

(B) The seller of travel obtains from each passenger, written acknowledgment that the passenger has not received disclosure of the terms and conditions required by this section.

(b) If a seller of travel offers, sells, provides, or distributes a travel certificate as defined in Section 17550.10 and any passenger payment is nonrefundable, in whole or in part, the seller of travel
 shall obtain the written acknowledgment of that limitation from the end user prior to, or at the time of, receipt of any money or other valuable consideration.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if money or other valuable consideration is received from a customer to whom the seller of travel has sold air or sea transportation within the preceding 12 months and the disclosures required by this section are substantially the same as the disclosures given in connection with the prior travel, the disclosures required by this section shall be made within five days of receipt of that money or other valuable consideration.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if money or other valuable consideration is received in payment for air transportation and the seller of travel is an officially appointed agent in good standing of the Airlines Reporting
 Corporation and forwards the amount paid, without offsetting or reducing the amount forwarded by any amounts due or claimed in connection with any other transaction, to the airline providing the transportation or to the Airlines Reporting Corporation, the disclosures required by this section with respect to that air transportation may be made orally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 628, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.14.

(a) The seller of travel has an obligation either to provide the air or sea transportation or travel services purchased by the passenger or to make a refund as provided by this section. The seller of travel shall return to the passenger all moneys paid for air or sea transportation or travel services not actually provided to the passenger, within either of the following periods, whichever is earlier:

(1) Thirty days from one of the following dates:

(A) The scheduled date of departure.

(B) The day the passenger requests a refund.

(C) The day of cancellation by the seller of travel.

(2) Three days from the day the seller of travel is first unable to provide the air or sea transportation or travel services.

As used in this section, “unable to provide” includes, but is not limited to, any day on which the passenger’s funds are not in the trust account required by Section 17550.15 and subdivision (g) of Section 17550.21 or the funds necessary to provide the passenger’s transportation or travel services have been disbursed other than as allowed by Section 17550.15 or subdivision (a) of Section 17550.16.

(b) If the seller of travel has disbursed the passenger’s funds pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 17550.15 and the disbursement is in full payment for the services or transportation purchased by the passenger, the seller of travel may, instead of providing a refund, provide to the passenger a written statement accompanied by bank records establishing that the passenger’s funds were disbursed as required by those provisions and, if disbursed to a seller of travel, proof of current registration of that seller of travel. A seller of travel who is exempt from the requirements of Section 17550.15 pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17550.16 and who is in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 17550.16 may comply with this section by maintaining and providing to the passenger documentary proof of disbursement in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 17550.16, and proof of current registration of the seller of travel to whom the funds were disbursed,
 which registration shall note that the registered seller of travel either has a trust account in compliance with Section 17550.15, or is exempt from the requirements of Section 17550.15 pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 17550.16. This subdivision does not apply to refunds subject to subdivision (c) or (d).

(c) If terms and conditions relating to a refund upon cancellation by the passenger have been disclosed and agreed to by the passenger and the passenger elects to cancel for any reason other than a seller of travel being unable to provide the air or sea transportation or travel services purchased, the making of a refund in accordance with those terms and conditions shall be deemed to constitute compliance with this section.

(d) Any material misrepresentation by the seller of travel shall be deemed to be a violation of this article and cancellation by the seller of
 travel, necessitating a refund as required by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 628, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.15.

(a) This section applies to a seller of travel as defined in Section 17550.1.

(b) The seller of travel shall deposit directly into a trust account in a federally insured bank, savings and loan association, or credit union 100 percent of all sums received from any person or entity, including, but not limited to, those payments made in cash, by credit card, or any other method of payment, for air or sea transportation for any person, or for any travel services offered by the seller of travel, and any refunds made by carriers or providers of travel services. This subdivision does not require that a seller of travel establish a separate trust account for
 each transaction.

(c) The seller of travel shall not in any manner encumber the corpus of the trust account and shall not withdraw money therefrom except as follows:

(1) In partial or full payment to the carrier for transportation, or to the provider of travel services, for the services or transportation purchased by the passenger.

(2) In partial or full payment to the carrier or provider of travel services if payment is made by wire transfer directly to an account of the Airlines Reporting Corporation, or by check or draft paid to the Airlines Reporting Corporation for the transportation or services contracted for by the passenger.

(3) Upon delivery of all
 tickets or vouchers necessary for the passenger to obtain from the carrier or provider of travel services the transportation or services purchased by the passenger, at which time the seller of travel may withdraw the portion of the sum paid by the passenger that is due the seller of travel as compensation for sale of the transportation or travel services to that passenger. Tickets or vouchers shall be deemed delivered if personally delivered, turned over to an independent third-party delivery service for regular delivery to the passenger at the address designated by the passenger on the next business day, or deposited in the United States mail with first-class postage prepaid.

(4) Upon full payment to the provider of transportation or travel services, directly to the trust account identified in the registration of another seller of travel to
 whom the funds are paid, or to another registered seller of travel whose registration states that the other registered seller of travel is exempt pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 17550.16 from the requirements of this section, of the total amount that is required by the carrier or provider of transportation or travel services or other registered seller of travel in order to provide the transportation or services purchased by the passenger, at which time the seller of travel may withdraw from the trust account that portion of the sum paid by the passenger which is commission due the seller of travel for sale of the transportation or travel services to that passenger.

(5) To make refunds to the passenger.

(d) Subdivision (c) shall not prevent payment of the interest earned
 on the trust account to the seller of travel.

(e) The seller of travel shall serve as trustee of the trust accounts required by this article. If an individual person is the seller of travel, the individual person shall be the trustee; if the seller of travel is a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, a managing partner or partners, or the chief executive officer of the corporation, or executive officer or manager of a limited liability company shall be the trustee. The trustee may designate in writing that an officer or employee may manage the trust account if that officer or employee is under the trustee’s supervision and control, and the original of that writing is on file with the Attorney General’s office.

(f) (1) Except as
 otherwise provided in this section, all trust accounts required by this article shall be maintained at a branch of a federally insured bank, savings and loan association, or credit union.

(2) The seller of travel shall file with the Attorney General an irrevocable agreement in writing allowing the Attorney General, a district attorney, or their representatives, upon written request, to examine and obtain copies of all business records, including, but not limited to, those related to the trust account wherever those records may be, and including, but not limited to, those records relating to any travel business account, or any account used for any travel business transaction, or account to which trust funds have been deposited. The statement shall indicate that the authorization remains in effect as long as the seller of travel, financial
 institution, or other custodian of records retains records.

(3) A seller of travel shall maintain all business records described in paragraph (2) for a minimum period of three years.

(4) The Attorney General may maintain an action for recovery of examination costs and expenses in any court of competent jurisdiction, and may recover his or her reasonable costs and attorney’s fees as an item of costs, as provided for in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1033.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Costs and expenses for an examination under this section shall be paid for by the seller of travel if the Attorney General bills the seller of travel for those costs and expenses, provided that the
 examination shows that the seller of travel has failed to comply with any requirements of this chapter.

(g) Every seller of travel has a fiduciary responsibility with respect to all sums received for transportation or travel services.

(h) The following are deemed to be held in trust for passengers:

(1) All sums received by the seller of travel for transportation or travel services whether or not required to be deposited in an actual trust account and regardless of whether any of these sums were required to be deposited or actually were deposited in a trust account.

(2) All property with which any of the sums described in paragraph (1) has been commingled if any of these sums cannot be identified because of the commingling.
